Nebraska, session 109, LB1122.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1122 LB1122
2026 2026
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature that the total
amount appropriated to the Department of Health and Human Services, for
medicaid nursing facility rates for Program No. 348, specified as
$462,480,546 for FY2026-27 ($XXX General Funds and $XXX Federal Funds),
shall be used in the medicaid nursing facility rate calculation for
Program No. 348, including the calculation of the annual inflation
factor.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the total amount
appropriated for medicaid nursing facility rates for Program No. 348
includes amounts for rate enhancement and any other purpose related to
medicaid nursing facility services.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the department file a
report electronically with the Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the Clerk
of the Legislature no later than August 1, 2026, describing how the
inflation factor was calculated for FY2026-27 medicaid nursing facility
rates.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the department file a
report electronically with the Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the Clerk
of the Legislature on or after December 15, 2026, and before December 31,
2026, identifying the amount of any remaining unobligated appropriation
from the prior appropriations earmarked for medicaid nursing facility
payments. The report shall include an identification of encumbrances and
retroactive payments.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-